Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-222
Township officers; when elected; qualifications.

The officers of the township board shall be elected pursuant to the Election Act at the next general election held in November following appointment and shall have the qualifications required by sections 23-214 and 23-215.

Laws 1895, c. 28, § 20, p. 137;

R.S.1913, § 1006;

C.S.1922, § 908;

C.S.1929, § 26-222;

R.S.1943, § 23-222;

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 538;

Laws 1997, LB 764, § 6;

Laws 2003, LB 461, § 1.

Election Act, see section 32-101.

Although each township has a township board and township officers, each of which has statutorily prescribed powers and duties, the powers of the township are exercised through direct local self government. Butler County Dairy v. Butler County, 285 Neb. 408, 827 N.W.2d 267 (2013).

Road overseer is officer of township. Town of Denver v. Myers, 63 Neb. 107, 88 N.W. 191 (1901).